Utah statutes.
63J-1-211.    Appropriating from restricted accounts.
(1)  As used in this section, "operating deficit" means that estimated General
Fund or Uniform School Fund revenues are less than budgeted for the current or
next fiscal year.
(2)  Notwithstanding any other statute that limits the Legislature's power to
appropriate from a restricted account, if the Legislature determines that an
operating deficit exists, unless prohibited by federal law or court order, the
Legislature may, in eliminating the deficit, appropriate money from a
restricted account into the General Fund.
